Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2926
Formation of limited cooperative association; articles of organization.

(1) To form a limited cooperative association, articles of organization shall be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing. The articles shall state:

(a) The name of the limited cooperative association;

(b) The purposes for which the limited cooperative association was formed;

(c) The street and mailing addresses of the initial registered office and the name, street, and mailing addresses of the registered agent for service of process;

(d) The name and the street and mailing addresses of each organizer;

(e) The term for which the limited cooperative association is to exist, if other than perpetual;

(f) The number and terms of directors or the method in which the number and terms shall be determined; and

(g) Any additional information required by the Secretary of State.

(2) Articles of organization may contain any other matters deemed relevant by the organizer or organizers.

(3) Unless the articles of organization state a delayed effective date, a limited cooperative association is formed when the Secretary of State receives for filing the articles of organization. If the articles state a delayed effective date, a limited cooperative association is not formed if, before the articles take effect, one or more organizers sign and deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a notice of cancellation.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 26.